Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4201
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that it is in the best interests of persons under disability and the public for the authorities and responsibilities of a guardian ad litem to be expanded to include an objective investigation and assessment of the needs of a person who comes before the court in any guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding to ensure the protection of the rights of the person who is the subject of the proceeding. The Legislature also finds that the public is benefited from having trustworthy and competent guardians and conservators appointed for incapacitated persons, wards, protected persons, and minors.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 14.